District of Columbia statutes.
7-2502.02

Registration of certain firearms prohibited.

(a)

A registration certificate shall not be issued for a:

(1)

Sawed-off shotgun;

(2)

Machine gun;

(3)

Short-barreled rifle;

(4)

Pistol not validly registered to the current registrant in the District prior to September 24, 1976, except that the prohibition on registering a pistol shall not apply to:

(A)

Any organization that employs at least one commissioned special police officer or other employee licensed to carry a firearm and that arms the employee with a firearm during the employee’s duty hours;

(B)

A police officer who has retired from the Metropolitan Police Department;

(C)

Any person who seeks to register a pistol:

(i)

For use in self-defense within that person’s home or place of business; or

(ii)

As part of the application process for a license to carry a concealed pistol pursuant to § 7-2509.02; or

(D)

A firearms instructor, or an organization that employs a firearms instructor, for the purpose of conducting firearms training.

(5)

An unsafe firearm prohibited under § 7-2505.04;

(6)

An assault weapon; or

(7)

A .50 BMG rifle.

(b)

Repealed.

Sept. 24, 1976, D.C. Law 1-85, title II, § 202, 23 DCR 2464
Mar. 16, 1978, D.C. Law 2-62, § 2, 24 DCR 5780
May 7, 1993, D.C. Law 9-266, § 2(b), 39 DCR 5676
Mar. 31, 2009, D.C. Law 17-372, § 3(c), 56 DCR 1365
Sept. 29, 2012, D.C. Law 19-170, § 2(c), 59 DCR 5691
June 16, 2015, D.C. Law 20-279, § 2(b), 62 DCR 1944
This section is referenced in § 7-2502.09, § 7-2504.01, § 7-2505.02, and § 7-2507.06a.
1981 Ed., § 6-2312.
1973 Ed., § 6-1812.
D.C. Law 17-372, in subsec. (a), deleted “or” from the end of par. (3), rewrote par. (4), and added pars. (5), (6), and (7); and repealed subsec. (b).
The 2012 amendment by D.C. Law 19-170 added (a)(4)(D); and made related changes.
The 2015 amendment by D.C. Law 20-279 rewrote (a)(4)(C).
For temporary (225 days) amendment of this section, see § 2(b) of the License to Carry a Pistol Temporary Amendment Act of 2014 (D.C. Law 20-169, May 5, 2015, 61 DCR 11814).
For temporary (90 day) amendment, see § 2(a) of Firearms Control Emergency Amendment Act of 2008 (D.C. Act 17-422, July 16, 2008,
For temporary amendment of (a)(4), see § 2(c) of the Firearms Second Congressional Review Emergency Amendment Act of 2012 (D.C. Act 19-510, October 26, 2012, 59 DCR 12808).
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 2(b) of Second Firearms Control Emergency Amendment Act of 2008 (D.C. Act 17-502, September 16, 2008, 55 DCR 9904).
For temporary (90 day) repeal of D.C. Act 17-422, see § 5 of Second Firearms Control Emergency Amendment Act of 2008 (D.C. Act 17-502, September 16, 2008, 55 DCR 9904).
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see §§ 2(b) and 4 of Second Firearms Control Congressional Review Emergency Amendment Act of 2008 (D.C. Act 17-601, December 12, 2008, 56 DCR 9).
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 3(c) of Firearms Registration Emergency Amendment Act of 2008 (D.C. Act 17-651, January 6, 2009, 56 DCR 911).
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 2(c) of Firearms Emergency Amendment Act of 2012 (D.C. Act 19-352, May 11, 2012, 59 DCR 5116).
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 2(c) of the Firearms Amendments Congressional Review Emergency Amendment Act of 2012 (D.C. Act 19-394, July 18, 2012, 59 DCR 8694).
For temporary (90 days) amendment of this section, see § 2(b) of the License to Carry a Pistol Emergency Amendment Act of 2014 (D.C. Act 20-447, Oct. 7, 2014, 61 DCR 10765, 20 STAT 4175).
For temporary (90 days) repeal of emergency D.C. Act 20-447, § 4, the act’s applicability clause, see § 2 of the License to Carry a Pistol Clarification Emergency Amendment Act of 2014 (D.C. Act 20-448, Oct. 7, 2014, 61 DCR 10777, 20 STAT 4187).
For temporary (90 days) amendment of this section, see § 2(b) of the License to Carry a Pistol Second Emergency Amendment Act of 2014 (D.C. Act 20-564, Jan. 6, 2015, 62 DCR 866, 21 STAT 527).
For temporary (90 days) repeal of emergency D.C. Act 20-447, see § 4(b) of the License to Carry a Pistol Second Emergency Amendment Act of 2014 (D.C. Act 20-564, Jan. 6, 2015, 62 DCR 866, 21 STAT 527).
For temporary (90 days) repeal of temporary D.C. Act 20-169, see § 4(c) of the License to Carry a Pistol Second Emergency Amendment Act of 2014 (D.C. Act 20-564, Jan. 6, 2015, 62 DCR 866, 21 STAT 527).
For temporary (90 days) amendment of this section, see § 2(b) of the License to Carry a Pistol Congressional Review Emergency Amendment Act of 2015 (D.C. Act 21-74, June 4, 2015, 62 DCR 8242, 21 DCSTAT 1451).